Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-2969
Committees.

(1) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws, a board of directors may create one or more committees and appoint one or more individuals to serve on a committee.

(2) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws, an individual appointed to serve on a committee need not be a director or member of the limited cooperative association. An individual serving on a committee has the same rights, duties, and obligations as a director serving on a committee.

(3) Unless otherwise provided by the articles of organization or bylaws, each committee may exercise the powers as delegated by the board of directors except that no committee may:

(a) Approve allocations or distributions except according to a formula or method prescribed by the board of directors;

(b) Approve or propose to members action requiring approval of members; or

(c) Fill vacancies on the board of directors or any of its committees.

Laws 2007, LB368, § 69.